Florida, session 2026, SB552.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 56 57 Section 1.âSection 166.131, Florida Statutes, is amended to 58 read: 59 166.131âLevy of taxes for payment of debt.âThe governing 60 body of a municipality may levy ad valorem taxes upon real and 61 tangible personal property within the municipality as it deems 62 necessary to make payment, including principal and interest, 63 upon the general obligation and ad valorem bonded indebtedness 64 of the municipality or into any sinking funds created under s. 65 166.122. 66 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 166.211, Florida 67 Statutes, is amended to read: 68 166.211âAd valorem taxes.â 69 (1)âPursuant to s. 9, Art. VII of the State Constitution, a 70 municipality is hereby authorized, in a manner not inconsistent 71 with general law, to levy ad valorem taxes on real and tangible 72 personal property within the municipality in an amount not to 73 exceed 10 mills, exclusive of taxes levied for the payment of 74 bonds and taxes levied for periods of not longer than 2 years 75 and approved by a vote of the electors. 76 Section 3.âParagraph (d) of subsection (11) and subsections 77 (17) and (18) of section 192.001, Florida Statutes, are amended 78 to read: 79 192.001âDefinitions.âAll definitions set out in chapters 1 80 and 200 that are applicable to this chapter are included herein. 81 In addition, the following definitions shall apply in the 82 imposition of ad valorem taxes: 83 (11)ââPersonal property,â for the purposes of ad valorem 84 taxation, shall be divided into four categories as follows: 85 (d)ââTangible personal propertyâ means all goods, chattels, 86 and other articles of value (but does not include the vehicular 87 items enumerated in s. 1(b), Art. VII of the State Constitution 88 and elsewhere defined) capable of manual possession and whose 89 chief value is intrinsic to the article itself. âConstruction 90 work in progressâ consists of those items of tangible personal 91 property commonly known as fixtures, machinery, and equipment 92 when in the process of being installed in new or expanded 93 improvements to real property and whose value is materially 94 enhanced upon connection or use with a preexisting, taxable, 95 operational system or facility. Construction work in progress 96 shall be deemed substantially completed when connected with the 97 preexisting, taxable, operational system or facility. For the 98 purposes of tangible personal property constructed or installed 99 by an electric utility, construction work in progress shall be 100 deemed substantially completed upon the earlier of when all 101 permits or approvals required for commercial operation have been 102 received or approved, or 1 year after the construction work in 103 progress has been connected with the preexisting, taxable, 104 operational system or facility. Inventory and household goods 105 are expressly excluded from this definition. 106 (17)ââFloating structureâ means a floating barge-like 107 entity, with or without accommodations built thereon, which is 108 not primarily used as a means of transportation on water but 109 which serves purposes or provides services typically associated 110 with a structure or other improvement to real property. The term 111 âfloating structureâ includes, but is not limited to, each 112 entity used as a residence, place of business, office, hotel or 113 motel, restaurant or lounge, clubhouse, meeting facility, 114 storage or parking facility, mining platform, dredge, dragline, 115 or similar facility or entity represented as such. Floating 116 structures are expressly excluded from the definition of the 117 term âvesselâ provided in s. 327.02. Incidental movement upon 118 water does shall not, in and of itself, preclude an entity from 119 classification as a floating structure. A floating structure is 120 expressly included as a type of tangible personal property. 121 (18)ââComplete submission of the rollsâ includes, but is 122 not limited to, accurate tabular summaries of valuations as 123 prescribed by department rule; an electronic copy of the real 124 property assessment roll including for each parcel total value 125 of improvements, land value, the recorded selling prices, other 126 ownership transfer data required for an assessment roll under s. 127 193.114, the value of any improvement made to the parcel in the 128 12 months preceding the valuation date, the type and amount of 129 any exemption granted, and such other information as may be 130 required by department rule; an accurate tabular summary by 131 property class of any adjustments made to recorded selling 132 prices or fair market value in arriving at assessed value, as 133 prescribed by department rule; an electronic copy of the 134 tangible personal property assessment roll, including for each 135 entry a unique account number and such other information as may 136 be required by department rule; and an accurate tabular summary 137 of per-acre land valuations used for each class of agricultural 138 property in preparing the assessment roll, as prescribed by 139 department rule. 140 Section 4.âParagraph (i) of subsection (1), paragraph (e) 141 of subsection (3), and paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of 142 section 192.0105, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 143 192.0105âTaxpayer rights.âThere is created a Florida 144 Taxpayerâs Bill of Rights for property taxes and assessments to 145 guarantee that the rights, privacy, and property of the 146 taxpayers of this state are adequately safeguarded and protected 147 during tax levy, assessment, collection, and enforcement 148 processes administered under the revenue laws of this state. The 149 Taxpayerâs Bill of Rights compiles, in one document, brief but 150 comprehensive statements that summarize the rights and 151 obligations of the property appraisers, tax collectors, clerks 152 of the court, local governing boards, the Department of Revenue, 153 and taxpayers. Additional rights afforded to payors of taxes and 154 assessments imposed under the revenue laws of this state are 155 provided in s. 213.015. The rights afforded taxpayers to assure 156 that their privacy and property are safeguarded and protected 157 during tax levy, assessment, and collection are available only 158 insofar as they are implemented in other parts of the Florida 159 Statutes or rules of the Department of Revenue. The rights so 160 guaranteed to state taxpayers in the Florida Statutes and the 161 departmental rules include: 162 (1)âTHE RIGHT TO KNOW.â 163 (i)âThe right to an advertisement in a newspaper listing 164 names of taxpayers who are delinquent in paying tangible 165 personal property taxes, with amounts due, and giving notice 166 that interest is accruing at 18 percent and that, unless taxes 167 are paid, warrants will be issued, prior to petition made with 168 the circuit court for an order to seize and sell property (see 169 s. 197.402(2)). 170 171 Notwithstanding the right to information contained in this 172 subsection, under s. 197.122 property owners are held to know 173 that property taxes are due and payable annually and are charged 174 with a duty to ascertain the amount of current and delinquent 175 taxes and obtain the necessary information from the applicable 176 governmental officials. 177 (3)âTHE RIGHT TO REDRESS.â 178 (e)âThe right to an extension to file a tangible personal 179 property tax return upon making proper and timely request (see 180 s. 193.063). 181 (4)âTHE RIGHT TO CONFIDENTIALITY.â 182 (a)âThe right to have information kept confidential, 183 including federal tax information, ad valorem tax returns, 184 social security numbers, all financial records produced by the 185 taxpayer, Form DR-219 returns for documentary stamp tax 186 information, and sworn statements of gross income, copies of 187 federal income tax returns for the prior year, wage and earnings 188 statements (W-2 forms), and other documents (see ss. 192.105, 189 193.074, 193.114(4) 193.114(5), 195.027(3) and (5) (6), and 190 196.101(4)(c)). 191 Section 5.âSection 192.032, Florida Statutes, is amended to 192 read: 193 192.032âSitus of property for assessment purposes.âAll 194 property shall be assessed according to its situs as follows: 195 (1)âReal property, shall be assessed in the that county and 196 taxing jurisdiction in which it is located and in that taxing 197 jurisdiction in which it may be located. 198 (2)âAll tangible personal property which is not immune 199 under the state or federal constitutions from ad valorem 200 taxation, in that county and taxing jurisdiction in which it is 201 physically present on January 1 of each year unless such 202 property has been physically present in another county of this 203 state at any time during the preceding 12-month period, in which 204 case the provisions of subsection (3) apply. Additionally, 205 tangible personal property brought into the state after January 206 1 and before April 1 of any year shall be taxable for that year 207 if the property appraiser has reason to believe that such 208 property will be removed from the state prior to January 1 of 209 the next succeeding year. However, tangible personal property 210 physically present in the state on or after January 1 for 211 temporary purposes only, which property is in the state for 30 212 days or less, shall not be subject to assessment. This 213 subsection does not apply to goods in transit as described in 214 subsection (4) or supersede the provisions of s. 193.085(4). 215 (3)âIf more than one county of this state assesses the same 216 tangible personal property in the same assessment year, 217 resolution of such multicounty dispute shall be governed by the 218 following provisions: 219 (a)âTangible personal property which was physically present 220 in one county of this state on January 1, but present in another 221 county of this state at any time during the preceding year, 222 shall be assessed in the county and taxing jurisdiction where it 223 was habitually located or typically present. All tangible 224 personal property which is removed from one county in this state 225 to another county after January 1 of any year shall be subject 226 to taxation for that year in the county where located on January 227 1; except that this subsection does not apply to tangible 228 personal property located in a county on January 1 on a 229 temporary or transitory basis if such property is included in 230 the tax return being filed in the county in this state where 231 such tangible personal property is habitually located or 232 typically present. 233 (b)âFor purposes of this subsection, an item of tangible 234 personal property is âhabitually located or typically presentâ 235 in the county where it is generally kept for use or storage or 236 where it is consistently returned for use or storage. For 237 purposes of this subsection, an item of tangible personal 238 property is located in a county on a âtemporary or transitory 239 basisâ if it is located in that county for a short duration or 240 limited utilization with an intention to remove it to another 241 county where it is usually used or stored. 242 (4)(a)âPersonal property manufactured or produced outside 243 this state and brought into this state only for transshipment 244 out of the United States, or manufactured or produced outside 245 the United States and brought into this state for transshipment 246 out of this state, for sale in the ordinary course of trade or 247 business is considered goods-in-transit and shall not be deemed 248 to have acquired a taxable situs within a county even though the 249 property is temporarily halted or stored within the state. 250 (b)âThe term âgoods-in-transitâ implies that the personal 251 property manufactured or produced outside this state and brought 252 into this state has not been diverted to domestic use and has 253 not reached its final destination, which may be evidenced by the 254 fact that the individual unit packaging device utilized in the 255 shipping of the specific personal property has not been opened 256 except for inspection, storage, or other process utilized in the 257 transportation of the personal property. 258 (c)âPersonal property transshipped into this state and 259 subjected in this state to a subsequent manufacturing process or 260 used in this state in the production of other personal property 261 is not goods-in-transit. Breaking in bulk, labeling, packaging, 262 relabeling, or repacking of such property solely for its 263 inspection, storage, or transportation to its final destination 264 outside the state shall not be considered to be a manufacturing 265 process or the production of other personal property within the 266 meaning of this subsection. However, such storage shall not 267 exceed 180 days. 268 (5)(a)âNotwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2), 269 personal property used as a marine cargo container in the 270 conduct of foreign or interstate commerce shall not be deemed to 271 have acquired a taxable situs within a county when the property 272 is temporarily halted or stored within the state for a period 273 not exceeding 180 days. 274 (b)ââMarine cargo containerâ means a nondisposable 275 receptacle which is of a permanent character, strong enough to 276 be suitable for repeated use; which is specifically designed to 277 facilitate the carriage of goods by one or more modes of 278 transport, one of which shall be by ocean vessel, without 279 intermediate reloading; and which is fitted with devices 280 permitting its ready handling, particularly in the transfer from 281 one transport mode to another. The term âmarine cargo containerâ 282 includes a container when carried on a chassis but does not 283 include a vehicle or packaging. 284 (6)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this section, 285 tangible personal property used in traveling shows such as 286 carnivals, ice shows, or circuses shall be deemed to be 287 physically present or habitually located or typically present 288 only to the extent the value of such property is multiplied by a 289 fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days such 290 property is present in Florida during the taxable year and the 291 denominator of which is the number of days in the taxable year. 292 However, railroad property of such traveling shows shall be 293 taxable under s. 193.085(4)(b) and not under this section. 294 Section 6.âSection 192.042, Florida Statutes, is amended to 295 read: 296 192.042âDate of assessment.âAll property shall be assessed 297 according to its just value as follows: 298 (1)âReal property shall be assessed according to its just 299 value, on January 1 of each year. Improvements or portions not 300 substantially completed on January 1 shall have no value placed 301 thereon. The term âsubstantially completedâ means shall mean 302 that the improvement or some self-sufficient unit within it can 303 be used for the purpose for which it was constructed. 304 (2)âTangible personal property, on January 1, except 305 construction work in progress shall have no value placed thereon 306 until substantially completed as defined in s. 192.001(11)(d). 307 Section 7.âSubsection (2) of section 192.091, Florida 308 Statutes, is amended to read: 309 192.091âCommissions of property appraisers and tax 310 collectors.â 311 (2)âThe tax collectors of the several counties of the state 312 shall be entitled to receive, upon the amount of all real and 313 tangible personal property taxes and special assessments 314 collected and remitted, the following commissions: 315 (a)âOn the county tax: 316 1.âTen percent on the first $100,000; 317 2.âFive percent on the next $100,000; 318 3.âThree percent on the balance up to the amount of taxes 319 collected and remitted on an assessed valuation of $50 million; 320 and 321 4.âTwo percent on the balance. 322 (b)âOn collections on behalf of each taxing district and 323 special assessment district: 324 1.a.âThree percent on the amount of taxes collected and 325 remitted on an assessed valuation of $50 million; and 326 b.âTwo percent on the balance; and 327 2.âActual costs of collection, not to exceed 2 percent, on 328 the amount of special assessments collected and remitted. 329 330 For the purposes of this subsection, the commissions on the 331 amount of taxes collected from the nonvoted school millage, and 332 on the amount of additional taxes that would be collected for 333 school districts if the exemptions applicable to homestead 334 property for school district taxation were the same as 335 exemptions applicable for all other ad valorem taxation, shall 336 be paid by the board of county commissioners. 337 Section 8.âSection 193.016, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 338 Section 9.âSubsections (1), (3), and (7) of section 339 193.052, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 340 193.052âPreparation and serving of returns.â 341 (1)âThe following returns shall be filed: 342 (a)âTangible personal property; and 343 (b)âProperty specifically required to be returned by other 344 provisions in this title must be filed. 345 (3)âA return for the above types of property required to be 346 returned must shall be filed in each county which is the situs 347 of such property, as set out under s. 192.032. 348 (7)âA property appraiser may accept a tangible personal 349 property tax return in a form initiated through an electronic 350 data interchange. The department shall prescribe by rule the 351 format and instructions necessary for such filing to ensure that 352 all property is properly listed. The acceptable method of 353 transfer, the method, form, and content of the electronic data 354 interchange, the method by which the taxpayer will be provided 355 with an acknowledgment, and the duties of the property appraiser 356 with respect to such filing shall be prescribed by the 357 department. The departmentâs rules shall provide: a uniform 358 format for all counties; that the format shall resemble form DR 359 405 as closely as possible; and that adequate safeguards for 360 verification of taxpayersâ identities are established to avoid 361 filing by unauthorized persons. 362 Section 10.âSubsection (1) of section 193.062, Florida 363 Statutes, is amended to read: 364 193.062âDates for filing returns.âAll returns shall be 365 filed according to the following schedule: 366 (1)âTangible personal propertyâApril 1. 367 Section 11.âSection 193.063, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 368 Section 12.âSection 193.073, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 369 Section 13.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 193.114, 370 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 371 193.114âPreparation of assessment rolls.â 372 (1)âEach property appraiser shall prepare the following 373 assessment rolls: 374 (a)âreal property assessment roll. 375 (b)âTangible personal property assessment roll. This roll 376 shall include taxable household goods and all other taxable 377 tangible personal property. 378 (3)âThe tangible personal property roll shall include: 379 (a)âAn industry code. 380 (b)âA code reference to tax returns showing the property. 381 (c)âThe just value of furniture, fixtures, and equipment. 382 (d)âThe just value of leasehold improvements. 383 (e)âThe assessed value. 384 (f)âThe difference between just value and school district 385 and nonschool district assessed value for each statutory 386 provision resulting in such difference. 387 (g)âThe taxable value. 388 (h)âThe amount of each exemption or discount causing a 389 difference between assessed and taxable value. 390 (i)âThe penalty rate. 391 (j)âThe name and address of the owner or fiduciary 392 responsible for the payment of taxes on the property and an 393 indicator of fiduciary capacity, as appropriate. 394 (k)âThe state of domicile of the owner. 395 (l)âThe physical address of the property. 396 (m)âThe millage for each taxing authority levying tax on 397 the property. 398 Section 14.âParagraph (g) of subsection (3) of section 399 194.011, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 400 194.011âAssessment notice; objections to assessments.â 401 (3)âA petition to the value adjustment board must be in 402 substantially the form prescribed by the department. 403 Notwithstanding s. 195.022, a county officer may not refuse to 404 accept a form provided by the department for this purpose if the 405 taxpayer chooses to use it. A petition to the value adjustment 406 board must be signed by the taxpayer or be accompanied at the 407 time of filing by the taxpayerâs written authorization or power 408 of attorney, unless the person filing the petition is listed in 409 s. 194.034(1)(a). A person listed in s. 194.034(1)(a) may file a 410 petition with a value adjustment board without the taxpayerâs 411 signature or written authorization by certifying under penalty 412 of perjury that he or she has authorization to file the petition 413 on behalf of the taxpayer. If a taxpayer notifies the value 414 adjustment board that a petition has been filed for the 415 taxpayerâs property without his or her consent, the value 416 adjustment board may require the person filing the petition to 417 provide written authorization from the taxpayer authorizing the 418 person to proceed with the appeal before a hearing is held. If 419 the value adjustment board finds that a person listed in s. 420 194.034(1)(a) willfully and knowingly filed a petition that was 421 not authorized by the taxpayer, the value adjustment board shall 422 require such person to provide the taxpayerâs written 423 authorization for representation to the value adjustment board 424 clerk before any petition filed by that person is heard, for 1 425 year after imposition of such requirement by the value 426 adjustment board. A power of attorney or written authorization 427 is valid for 1 assessment year, and a new power of attorney or 428 written authorization by the taxpayer is required for each 429 subsequent assessment year. A petition shall also describe the 430 property by parcel number and shall be filed as follows: 431 (g)âAn owner of multiple tangible personal property 432 accounts may file with the value adjustment board a single joint 433 petition if the property appraiser determines that the tangible 434 personal property accounts are substantially similar in nature. 435 Section 15.âSubsection (1) of section 194.013, Florida 436 Statutes, is amended to read: 437 194.013âFiling fees for petitions; disposition; waiver.â 438 (1)âIf required by resolution of the value adjustment 439 board, a petition filed pursuant to s. 194.011 must shall be 440 accompanied by a filing fee to be paid to the clerk of the value 441 adjustment board in an amount determined by the board not to 442 exceed $50 for each separate parcel of real property, real or 443 personal, covered by the petition and subject to appeal. 444 However, such filing fee may not be required with respect to an 445 appeal from the disapproval of homestead exemption under s. 446 196.151 or from the denial of tax deferral under s. 197.2425. 447 Only a single filing fee may shall be charged under this section 448 as to any particular parcel of real property or tangible 449 personal property account despite the existence of multiple 450 issues and hearings pertaining to such parcel or account. For 451 joint petitions filed pursuant to s. 194.011(3)(e) or, (f), or 452 (g), a single filing fee shall be charged. Such fee must shall 453 be calculated as the cost of the special magistrate for the time 454 involved in hearing the joint petition and may shall not exceed 455 $5 per parcel of real property or tangible property account. 456 Such fee is to be proportionately paid by affected parcel 457 owners. 458 Section 16.âParagraph (j) of subsection (1) of section 459 194.034, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 460 194.034âHearing procedures; rules.â 461 (1) 462 (j)âAn assessment may not be contested unless a return as 463 required by s. 193.052 was timely filed. For purposes of this 464 paragraph, the term âtimely filedâ means filed by the deadline 465 established in s. 193.062 or before the expiration of any 466 extension granted under s. 193.063. If notice is mailed pursuant 467 to s. 193.073(1)(a), a complete return must be submitted under 468 s. 193.073(1)(a) for the assessment to be contested. 469 Section 17.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 194.035, 470 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 471 194.035âSpecial magistrates; property evaluators.â 472 (1)âIn counties having a population of more than 75,000, 473 the board shall appoint special magistrates for the purpose of 474 taking testimony and making recommendations to the board, which 475 recommendations the board may act upon without further hearing. 476 These special magistrates may not be elected or appointed 477 officials or employees of the county but shall be selected from 478 a list of those qualified individuals who are willing to serve 479 as special magistrates. Employees and elected or appointed 480 officials of a taxing jurisdiction or of the state may not serve 481 as special magistrates. The clerk of the board shall annually 482 notify such individuals or their professional associations to 483 make known to them that opportunities to serve as special 484 magistrates exist. The Department of Revenue shall provide a 485 list of qualified special magistrates to any county with a 486 population of 75,000 or less. Subject to appropriation, the 487 department shall reimburse counties with a population of 75,000 488 or less for payments made to special magistrates appointed for 489 the purpose of taking testimony and making recommendations to 490 the value adjustment board pursuant to this section. The 491 department shall establish a reasonable range for payments per 492 case to special magistrates based on such payments in other 493 counties. Requests for reimbursement of payments outside this 494 range shall be justified by the county. If the total of all 495 requests for reimbursement in any year exceeds the amount 496 available pursuant to this section, payments to all counties 497 must shall be prorated accordingly. If a county having a 498 population less than 75,000 does not appoint a special 499 magistrate to hear each petition, the person or persons 500 designated to hear petitions before the value adjustment board 501 or the attorney appointed to advise the value adjustment board 502 must shall attend the training provided pursuant to subsection 503 (3), regardless of whether the person would otherwise be 504 required to attend, but may shall not be required to pay the 505 tuition fee specified in subsection (3). A special magistrate 506 appointed to hear issues of exemptions, classifications, and 507 determinations that a change of ownership, a change of ownership 508 or control, or a qualifying improvement has occurred shall be a 509 member of The Florida Bar with no less than 5 yearsâ experience 510 in the area of ad valorem taxation. A special magistrate 511 appointed to hear issues regarding the valuation of real estate 512 shall be a state certified real estate appraiser with not less 513 than 5 yearsâ experience in real property valuation. A special 514 magistrate appointed to hear issues regarding the valuation of 515 tangible personal property shall be a designated member of a 516 nationally recognized appraiserâs organization with not less 517 than 5 yearsâ experience in tangible personal property 518 valuation. A special magistrate need not be a resident of the 519 county in which he or she serves. A special magistrate may not 520 represent a person before the board in any tax year during which 521 he or she has served that board as a special magistrate. An 522 appraisal may not be submitted as evidence to a value adjustment 523 board in any year that the person who performed the appraisal 524 serves as a special magistrate to that value adjustment board. 525 Before appointing a special magistrate, a value adjustment board 526 shall verify the special magistrateâs qualifications. The value 527 adjustment board shall ensure that the selection of special 528 magistrates is based solely upon the experience and 529 qualifications of the special magistrate and is not influenced 530 by the property appraiser. The special magistrate shall 531 accurately and completely preserve all testimony and, in making 532 recommendations to the value adjustment board, shall include 533 proposed findings of fact, conclusions of law, and reasons for 534 upholding or overturning the determination of the property 535 appraiser. The expense of hearings before magistrates and any 536 compensation of special magistrates shall be borne three-fifths 537 by the board of county commissioners and two-fifths by the 538 school board. When appointing special magistrates or when 539 scheduling special magistrates for specific hearings, the board, 540 the board attorney, and the board clerk may not consider the 541 dollar amount or percentage of any assessment reductions 542 recommended by any special magistrate in the current year or in 543 any previous year. 544 (3)âThe department shall provide and conduct training for 545 special magistrates at least once each state fiscal year in at 546 least five locations throughout the state. Such training must 547 shall emphasize the departmentâs standard measures of value, 548 including the guidelines for real and tangible personal 549 property. Notwithstanding subsection (1), a person who has 3 550 years of relevant experience and who has completed the training 551 provided by the department under this subsection may be 552 appointed as a special magistrate. The training must shall be 553 open to the public. The department shall charge tuition fees to 554 any person attending this training in an amount sufficient to 555 fund the departmentâs costs to conduct all aspects of the 556 training. The department shall deposit the fees collected into 557 the Certification Program Trust Fund pursuant to s. 195.002(2). 558 Section 18.âParagraph (g) of subsection (2) of section 559 194.037, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 560 194.037âDisclosure of tax impact.â 561 (2)âThere must be a line entry in each of the columns 562 described in subsection (1), for each of the following property 563 classes: 564 (g)âTangible personal property, which must be identified as 565 âBusiness Machinery and Equipment.â 566 Section 19.âSubsection (4) of section 195.027, Florida 567 Statutes, is amended to read: 568 195.027âRules and regulations.â 569 (4)(a)âThe rules and regulations prescribed by the 570 department shall require a return of tangible personal property 571 which shall include: 572 1.âA general identification and description of the property 573 or, when more than one item constitutes a class of similar 574 items, a description of the class. 575 2.âThe location of such property. 576 3.âThe original cost of such property and, in the case of a 577 class of similar items, the average cost. 578 4.âThe age of such property and, in the case of a class of 579 similar items, the average age. 580 5.âThe condition, including functional and economic 581 depreciation or obsolescence. 582 6.âThe taxpayerâs estimate of fair market value. 583 (b)âFor purposes of this subsection, a class of property 584 shall include only those items which are substantially similar 585 in function and use. Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the 586 department to prescribe a return requiring information other 587 than that contained in this subsection; nor shall the department 588 issue or promulgate any rule or regulation directing the 589 assessment of property by the consideration of factors other 590 than those enumerated in s. 193.011. 591 Section 20.âSubsection (2) of section 195.073, Florida 592 Statutes, is amended to read: 593 195.073âClassification of property.âAll items required by 594 law to be on the assessment rolls must receive a classification 595 based upon the use of the property. The department shall 596 promulgate uniform definitions for all classifications. The 597 department may designate other subclassifications of property. 598 No assessment roll may be approved by the department which does 599 not show proper classifications. 600 (2)âPersonal property shall be classified as: 601 (a)âFloating structuresâresidential. 602 (b)âFloating structuresânonresidential. 603 (c)âMobile homes and attachments. 604 (d)âHousehold goods. 605 (e)âOther tangible personal property. 606 Section 21.âSection 195.101, Florida Statutes, is amended 607 to read: 608 195.101âWithholding of state funds.â 609 (1)âThe Department of Revenue is hereby directed to 610 determine each year whether the several counties of this state 611 are assessing the real and tangible personal property within 612 their jurisdiction in accordance with law. If the Department of 613 Revenue determines that any county is assessing property at less 614 than that prescribed by law, the Chief Financial Officer must 615 shall withhold from such county a portion of any state funds to 616 which the county may be entitled equal to the difference of the 617 amount assessed and the amount required to be assessed by law. 618 (2)âThe Department of Revenue is hereby directed to 619 determine each year whether the several municipalities of this 620 state are assessing the real and tangible personal property 621 within their jurisdiction in accordance with law. If the 622 Department of Revenue determines that any municipality is 623 assessing property at less than that prescribed by law, the 624 Chief Financial Officer must shall withhold from such 625 municipality a portion of any state funds to which that 626 municipality may be entitled equal to the difference of the 627 amount assessed and the amount required to be assessed by law. 628 Section 22.âSubsection (3) of section 196.011, Florida 629 Statutes, is amended to read: 630 196.011âAnnual application required for exemption.â 631 (3)âIt is shall not be necessary to make annual application 632 for exemption on houses of public worship, the lots on which 633 they are located, personal property located therein or thereon, 634 parsonages, burial grounds and tombs owned by houses of public 635 worship, individually owned burial rights not held for 636 speculation, or other such property not rented or hired out for 637 other than religious or educational purposes at any time; 638 household goods and personal effects of permanent residents of 639 this state; and property of the state or any county, any 640 municipality, any school district, or community college district 641 thereof. 642 Section 23.âSubsection (6) of section 196.012, Florida 643 Statutes, is amended to read: 644 196.012âDefinitions.âFor the purpose of this chapter, the 645 following terms are defined as follows, except where the context 646 clearly indicates otherwise: 647 (6)âGovernmental, municipal, or public purpose or function 648 shall be deemed to be served or performed when the lessee under 649 any leasehold interest created in property of the United States, 650 the state or any of its political subdivisions, or any 651 municipality, agency, special district, authority, or other 652 public body corporate of the state is demonstrated to perform a 653 function or serve a governmental purpose which could properly be 654 performed or served by an appropriate governmental unit or which 655 is demonstrated to perform a function or serve a purpose which 656 would otherwise be a valid subject for the allocation of public 657 funds. For purposes of the preceding sentence, an activity 658 undertaken by a lessee which is permitted under the terms of its 659 lease of real property designated as an aviation area on an 660 airport layout plan which has been approved by the Federal 661 Aviation Administration and which real property is used for the 662 administration, operation, business offices and activities 663 related specifically thereto in connection with the conduct of 664 an aircraft full service fixed base operation which provides 665 goods and services to the general aviation public in the 666 promotion of air commerce shall be deemed an activity which 667 serves a governmental, municipal, or public purpose or function. 668 Any activity undertaken by a lessee which is permitted under the 669 terms of its lease of real property designated as a public 670 airport as defined in s. 332.004(14) by municipalities, 671 agencies, special districts, authorities, or other public bodies 672 corporate and public bodies politic of the state, a spaceport as 673 defined in s. 331.303, or which is located in a deepwater port 674 identified in s. 403.021(9)(b) and owned by one of the foregoing 675 governmental units, subject to a leasehold or other possessory 676 interest of a nongovernmental lessee that is deemed to perform 677 an aviation, airport, aerospace, maritime, or port purpose or 678 operation shall be deemed an activity that serves a 679 governmental, municipal, or public purpose. The use by a lessee, 680 licensee, or management company of real property or a portion 681 thereof as a convention center, visitor center, sports facility 682 with permanent seating, concert hall, arena, stadium, park, or 683 beach is deemed a use that serves a governmental, municipal, or 684 public purpose or function when access to the property is open 685 to the general public with or without a charge for admission. If 686 property deeded to a municipality by the United States is 687 subject to a requirement that the Federal Government, through a 688 schedule established by the Secretary of the Interior, determine 689 that the property is being maintained for public historic 690 preservation, park, or recreational purposes and if those 691 conditions are not met the property will revert back to the 692 Federal Government, then such property is shall be deemed to 693 serve a municipal or public purpose. The term âgovernmental 694 purposeâ also includes a direct use of property on federal lands 695 in connection with the Federal Governmentâs Space Exploration 696 Program or spaceport activities as defined in s. 212.02(22). 697 Real property and tangible personal property owned by the 698 Federal Government or Space Florida and used for defense and 699 space exploration purposes or which is put to a use in support 700 thereof is shall be deemed to perform an essential national 701 governmental purpose and is shall be exempt. âOwned by the 702 lesseeâ as used in this chapter does not include personal 703 property, buildings, or other real property improvements used 704 for the administration, operation, business offices and 705 activities related specifically thereto in connection with the 706 conduct of an aircraft full service fixed based operation which 707 provides goods and services to the general aviation public in 708 the promotion of air commerce provided that the real property is 709 designated as an aviation area on an airport layout plan 710 approved by the Federal Aviation Administration. For purposes of 711 determination of âownership,â buildings and other real property 712 improvements which will revert to the airport authority or other 713 governmental unit upon expiration of the term of the lease shall 714 be deemed âownedâ by the governmental unit and not the lessee. 715 Also, for purposes of determination of ownership under this 716 section or s. 196.199(5), flight simulation training devices 717 qualified by the Federal Aviation Administration, and the 718 equipment and software necessary for the operation of such 719 devices, shall be deemed âownedâ by a governmental unit and not 720 the lessee if such devices will revert to that governmental unit 721 upon the expiration of the term of the lease, provided the 722 governing body of the governmental unit has approved the lease 723 in writing. Providing two-way telecommunications services to the 724 public for hire by the use of a telecommunications facility, as 725 defined in s. 364.02(14), and for which a certificate is 726 required under chapter 364 does not constitute an exempt use for 727 purposes of s. 196.199, unless the telecommunications services 728 are provided by the operator of a public-use airport, as defined 729 in s. 332.004, for the operatorâs provision of 730 telecommunications services for the airport or its tenants, 731 concessionaires, or licensees, or unless the telecommunications 732 services are provided by a public hospital. 733 Section 24.âSection 196.021, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 734 Section 25.âSection 196.182, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 735 Section 26.âSection 196.183, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 736 Section 27.âSubsection (3) of section 196.192, Florida 737 Statutes, is amended to read: 738 196.192âExemptions from ad valorem taxation.âSubject to the 739 provisions of this chapter: 740 (3)âAll tangible personal property loaned or leased by a 741 natural person, by a trust holding property for a natural 742 person, or by an exempt entity to an exempt entity for public 743 display or exhibition on a recurrent schedule is exempt from ad 744 valorem taxation if the property is loaned or leased for no 745 consideration or for nominal consideration. 746 747 For purposes of this section, each use to which the property is 748 being put must be considered in granting an exemption from ad 749 valorem taxation, including any economic use in addition to any 750 physical use. For purposes of this section, property owned by a 751 limited liability company, the sole member of which is an exempt 752 entity, shall be treated as if the property were owned directly 753 by the exempt entity. This section does not apply in determining 754 the exemption for property owned by governmental units pursuant 755 to s. 196.199. 756 Section 28.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) and paragraph 757 (b) of subsection (4) of section 196.1978, Florida Statutes, are 758 amended to read: 759 196.1978âAffordable housing property exemption.â 760 (3)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 761 1.ââCorporationâ means the Florida Housing Finance 762 Corporation. 763 2.ââNewly constructedâ means an improvement to real 764 property which was substantially completed within 5 years before 765 the date of an applicantâs first submission of a request for a 766 certification notice pursuant to this subsection. 767 3.ââSubstantially completedâ has the same meaning as in s. 768 192.042 s. 192.042(1). 769 (4) 770 (b)âThe multifamily project must: 771 1.âBe composed of an improvement to land where an 772 improvement did not previously exist or the construction of a 773 new improvement where an old improvement was removed, which was 774 substantially completed within 2 years before the first 775 submission of an application for exemption under this 776 subsection. For purposes of this subsection, the term 777 âsubstantially completedâ has the same definition as in s. 778 192.042 s. 192.042(1). 779 2.âContain more than 70 units that are used to provide 780 affordable housing to natural persons or families meeting the 781 extremely-low-income, very-low-income, or low-income limits 782 specified in s. 420.0004. 783 3.âBe subject to a land use restriction agreement with the 784 Florida Housing Finance Corporation, or a housing finance 785 authority pursuant to part IV of chapter 159, recorded in the 786 official records of the county in which the property is located 787 that requires that the property be used for 99 years to provide 788 affordable housing to natural persons or families meeting the 789 extremely-low-income, very-low-income, low-income, or moderate 790 income limits specified in s. 420.0004. The agreement must 791 include a provision for a penalty for ceasing to provide 792 affordable housing under the agreement before the end of the 793 agreement term that is equal to 100 percent of the total amount 794 financed by the corporation, or a housing finance authority 795 pursuant to part IV of chapter 159, multiplied by each year 796 remaining in the agreement. The agreement may be terminated or 797 modified without penalty if the exemption under this subsection 798 is repealed. 799 800 The property is no longer eligible for this exemption if the 801 property no longer serves extremely-low-income, very-low-income, 802 or low-income persons pursuant to the recorded agreement. 803 Section 29.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 804 196.19782, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 805 196.19782âExemption for affordable housing on governmental 806 property.â 807 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 808 (c)ââSubstantially completedâ has the same meaning as in s. 809 192.042 s. 192.042(1). 810 Section 30.âSubsections (5) and (8) of section 196.1995, 811 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 812 196.1995âEconomic development ad valorem tax exemption.â 813 (5)âUpon a majority vote in favor of such authority, the 814 board of county commissioners or the governing authority of the 815 municipality, at its discretion, by ordinance may exempt from ad 816 valorem taxation up to 100 percent of the assessed value of all 817 improvements to real property made by or for the use of a new 818 business and of all tangible personal property of such new 819 business, or up to 100 percent of the assessed value of all 820 added improvements to real property made to facilitate the 821 expansion of an existing business and of the net increase in all 822 tangible personal property acquired to facilitate such expansion 823 of an existing business. To qualify for this exemption, the 824 improvements to real property must be made or the tangible 825 personal property must be added or increased after approval by 826 motion or resolution of the local governing body, subject to 827 ordinance adoption or on or after the day the ordinance is 828 adopted. However, if the authority to grant exemptions is 829 approved in a referendum in which the ballot question contained 830 in subsection (3) appears on the ballot, the authority of the 831 board of county commissioners or the governing authority of the 832 municipality to grant exemptions is limited solely to new 833 businesses and expansions of existing businesses that are 834 located in an area which was designated as an enterprise zone 835 pursuant to chapter 290 as of December 30, 2015, or in a 836 brownfield area. New businesses and expansions of existing 837 businesses located in an area that was designated as an 838 enterprise zone pursuant to chapter 290 as of December 30, 2015, 839 but is not in a brownfield area, may qualify for the ad valorem 840 tax exemption only if approved by motion or resolution of the 841 local governing body, subject to ordinance adoption, or by 842 ordinance, enacted before December 31, 2015. Property acquired 843 to replace existing property may shall not be considered to 844 facilitate a business expansion. All data center equipment for a 845 data center is shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation for the 846 term of the approved exemption. The exemption applies only to 847 taxes levied by the respective unit of government granting the 848 exemption. The exemption does not apply, however, to taxes 849 levied for the payment of bonds or to taxes authorized by a vote 850 of the electors pursuant to s. 9(b) or s. 12, Art. VII of the 851 State Constitution. Any such exemption shall remain in effect 852 for up to 10 years with respect to any particular facility, or 853 up to 20 years for a data center, regardless of any change in 854 the authority of the county or municipality to grant such 855 exemptions or the expiration of the Enterprise Zone Act pursuant 856 to chapter 290. The exemption may shall not be prolonged or 857 extended by granting exemptions from additional taxes or by 858 virtue of any reorganization or sale of the business receiving 859 the exemption. 860 (8)âAny person, firm, or corporation which desires an 861 economic development ad valorem tax exemption shall, in the year 862 the exemption is desired to take effect, file a written 863 application on a form prescribed by the department with the 864 board of county commissioners or the governing authority of the 865 municipality, or both. The application shall request the 866 adoption of an ordinance granting the applicant an exemption 867 pursuant to this section and shall include all of the following 868 information: 869 (a)âThe name and location of the new business or the 870 expansion of an existing business.; 871 (b)âA description of the improvements to real property for 872 which an exemption is requested and the date of commencement of 873 construction of such improvements.; 874 (c)âA description of the tangible personal property for 875 which an exemption is requested and the dates when such property 876 was or is to be purchased; 877 (d)âProof, to the satisfaction of the board of county 878 commissioners or the governing authority of the municipality, 879 that the applicant is a new business or an expansion of an 880 existing business, as defined in s. 196.012.; 881 (d)(e)âThe number of jobs the applicant expects to create 882 along with the average wage of the jobs and whether the jobs are 883 full-time or part-time.; 884 (e)(f)âThe expected time schedule for job creation.; and 885 (f)(g)âOther information deemed necessary or appropriate by 886 the department, county, or municipality. 887 Section 31.âSection 197.146, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 888 Section 32.âSubsection (1) of section 197.343, Florida 889 Statutes, is amended to read: 890 197.343âTax notices; additional notice required.â 891 (1)âAn additional tax notice shall be sent, electronically 892 or by postal mail, by April 30 to each taxpayer whose payment 893 has not been received. Electronic transmission of the additional 894 tax notice may be used only with the express consent of the 895 property owner. If the electronic transmission is returned as 896 undeliverable, a second notice must be sent. However, the 897 original electronic transmission used with the consent of the 898 property owner is the official notice for the purposes of this 899 subsection. The notice shall include a description of the 900 property and a statement that if the taxes are not paid: 901 (a)âFor real property, a tax certificate may be sold; and 902 (b)âFor tangible personal property, the property may be 903 sold. 904 Section 33.âSubsection (2) of section 197.374, Florida 905 Statutes, is amended to read: 906 197.374âPartial payment of current year taxes.â 907 (2)âAt the discretion of the tax collector, the tax 908 collector may accept one or more partial payments of any amount 909 per parcel for payment of current taxes and assessments on real 910 property or tangible personal property as long as such payment 911 is made prior to the date of delinquency. The remaining amount 912 of tax due, when paid, must be paid in full. 913 Section 34.âSection 197.412, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 914 Section 35.âSubsection (1) of section 200.065, Florida 915 Statutes, is amended to read: 916 200.065âMethod of fixing millage.â 917 (1)âUpon completion of the assessment of all property 918 pursuant to s. 193.023, the property appraiser shall certify to 919 each taxing authority the taxable value within the jurisdiction 920 of the taxing authority. This certification shall include a copy 921 of the statement required to be submitted under s. 195.073(2) s. 922 195.073(3), as applicable to that taxing authority. The form on 923 which the certification is made shall include instructions to 924 each taxing authority describing the proper method of computing 925 a millage rate which, exclusive of new construction, additions 926 to structures, deletions, increases in the value of improvements 927 that have undergone a substantial rehabilitation which increased 928 the assessed value of such improvements by at least 100 percent, 929 property added due to geographic boundary changes, total taxable 930 value of tangible personal property within the jurisdiction in 931 excess of 115 percent of the previous yearâs total taxable 932 value, and any dedicated increment value, will provide the same 933 ad valorem tax revenue for each taxing authority as was levied 934 during the prior year less the amount, if any, paid or applied 935 as a consequence of an obligation measured by the dedicated 936 increment value. That millage rate shall be known as the 937 ârolled-back rate.â The property appraiser shall also include 938 instructions, as prescribed by the Department of Revenue, to 939 each county and municipality, each special district dependent to 940 a county or municipality, each municipal service taxing unit, 941 and each independent special district describing the proper 942 method of computing the millage rates and taxes levied as 943 specified in subsection (5). The Department of Revenue shall 944 prescribe the instructions and forms that are necessary to 945 administer this subsection and subsection (5). The information 946 provided pursuant to this subsection shall also be sent to the 947 tax collector by the property appraiser at the time it is sent 948 to each taxing authority. 949 Section 36.âParagraphs (g), (n), (o), (q), and (u) of 950 subsection (5) of section 212.08, Florida Statutes, are amended 951 to read: 952 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 953 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 954 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 955 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 956 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 957 chapter. 958 (5)âEXEMPTIONS; ACCOUNT OF USE.â 959 (g)âBuilding materials used in the rehabilitation of real 960 property located in an enterprise zone.â 961 1.âBuilding materials used in the rehabilitation of real 962 property located in an enterprise zone are exempt from the tax 963 imposed by this chapter upon an affirmative showing to the 964 satisfaction of the department that the items have been used for 965 the rehabilitation of real property located in an enterprise 966 zone. Except as provided in subparagraph 2., this exemption 967 inures to the owner, lessee, or lessor at the time the real 968 property is rehabilitated, but only through a refund of 969 previously paid taxes. To receive a refund pursuant to this 970 paragraph, the owner, lessee, or lessor of the rehabilitated 971 real property must file an application under oath with the 972 governing body or enterprise zone development agency having 973 jurisdiction over the enterprise zone where the business is 974 located, as applicable. A single application for a refund may be 975 submitted for multiple, contiguous parcels that were part of a 976 single parcel that was divided as part of the rehabilitation of 977 the property. All other requirements of this paragraph apply to 978 each parcel on an individual basis. The application must 979 include: 980 a.âThe name and address of the person claiming the refund. 981 b.âAn address and assessment roll parcel number of the 982 rehabilitated real property for which a refund of previously 983 paid taxes is being sought. 984 c.âA description of the improvements made to accomplish the 985 rehabilitation of the real property. 986 d.âA copy of a valid building permit issued by the county 987 or municipal building department for the rehabilitation of the 988 real property. 989 e.âA sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, from the 990 general contractor licensed in this state with whom the 991 applicant contracted to make the improvements necessary to 992 rehabilitate the real property, which lists the building 993 materials used to rehabilitate the real property, the actual 994 cost of the building materials, and the amount of sales tax paid 995 in this state on the building materials. If a general contractor 996 was not used, the applicant, not a general contractor, shall 997 make the sworn statement required by this sub-subparagraph. 998 Copies of the invoices that evidence the purchase of the 999 building materials used in the rehabilitation and the payment of 1000 sales tax on the building materials must be attached to the 1001 sworn statement provided by the general contractor or by the 1002 applicant. Unless the actual cost of building materials used in 1003 the rehabilitation of real property and the payment of sales 1004 taxes is documented by a general contractor or by the applicant 1005 in this manner, the cost of the building materials is deemed to 1006 be an amount equal to 40 percent of the increase in assessed 1007 value for ad valorem tax purposes. 1008 f.âThe identifying number assigned pursuant to s. 290.0065 1009 to the enterprise zone in which the rehabilitated real property 1010 is located. 1011 g.âA certification by the local building code inspector 1012 that the improvements necessary to rehabilitate the real 1013 property are substantially completed. 1014 h.âA statement of whether the business is a small business 1015 as defined by s. 288.703. 1016 i.âIf applicable, the name and address of each permanent 1017 employee of the business, including, for each employee who is a 1018 resident of an enterprise zone, the identifying number assigned 1019 pursuant to s. 290.0065 to the enterprise zone in which the 1020 employee resides. 1021 2.âThis exemption inures to a municipality, county, other 1022 governmental unit or agency, or nonprofit community-based 1023 organization through a refund of previously paid taxes if the 1024 building materials used in the rehabilitation are paid for from 1025 the funds of a community development block grant, State Housing 1026 Initiatives Partnership Program, or similar grant or loan 1027 program. To receive a refund, a municipality, county, other 1028 governmental unit or agency, or nonprofit community-based 1029 organization must file an application that includes the same 1030 information required in subparagraph 1. In addition, the 1031 application must include a sworn statement signed by the chief 1032 executive officer of the municipality, county, other 1033 governmental unit or agency, or nonprofit community-based 1034 organization seeking a refund which states that the building 1035 materials for which a refund is sought were funded by a 1036 community development block grant, State Housing Initiatives 1037 Partnership Program, or similar grant or loan program. 1038 3.âWithin 10 working days after receipt of an application, 1039 the governing body or enterprise zone development agency shall 1040 review the application to determine if it contains all the 1041 information required by subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2. and 1042 meets the criteria set out in this paragraph. The governing body 1043 or agency shall certify all applications that contain the 1044 required information and are eligible to receive a refund. If 1045 applicable, the governing body or agency shall also certify if 1046 20 percent of the employees of the business are residents of an 1047 enterprise zone, excluding temporary and part-time employees. 1048 The certification must be in writing, and a copy of the 1049 certification shall be transmitted to the executive director of 1050 the department. The applicant is responsible for forwarding a 1051 certified application to the department within the time 1052 specified in subparagraph 4. 1053 4.âAn application for a refund must be submitted to the 1054 department within 6 months after the rehabilitation of the 1055 property is deemed to be substantially completed by the local 1056 building code inspector or by November 1 after the rehabilitated 1057 property is first subject to assessment. 1058 5.âOnly one exemption through a refund of previously paid 1059 taxes for the rehabilitation of real property is permitted for 1060 any single parcel of property unless there is a change in 1061 ownership, a new lessor, or a new lessee of the real property. A 1062 refund may not be granted unless the amount to be refunded 1063 exceeds $500. A refund may not exceed the lesser of 97 percent 1064 of the Florida sales or use tax paid on the cost of the building 1065 materials used in the rehabilitation of the real property as 1066 determined pursuant to sub-subparagraph 1.e. or $5,000, or, if 1067 at least 20 percent of the employees of the business are 1068 residents of an enterprise zone, excluding temporary and part 1069 time employees, the amount of refund may not exceed the lesser 1070 of 97 percent of the sales tax paid on the cost of the building 1071 materials or $10,000. A refund shall be made within 30 days 1072 after formal approval by the department of the application for 1073 the refund. 1074 6.âThe department shall adopt rules governing the manner 1075 and form of refund applications and may establish guidelines as 1076 to the requisites for an affirmative showing of qualification 1077 for exemption under this paragraph. 1078 7.âThe department shall deduct an amount equal to 10 1079 percent of each refund granted under this paragraph from the 1080 amount transferred into the Local Government Half-cent Sales Tax 1081 Clearing Trust Fund pursuant to s. 212.20 for the county area in 1082 which the rehabilitated real property is located and shall 1083 transfer that amount to the General Revenue Fund. 1084 8.âFor the purposes of the exemption provided in this 1085 paragraph, the term: 1086 a.ââBuilding materialsâ means tangible personal property 1087 that becomes a component part of improvements to real property. 1088 b.ââReal propertyâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 1089 192.001(12), except that the term does not include a condominium 1090 parcel or condominium property as defined in s. 718.103. 1091 c.ââRehabilitation of real propertyâ means the 1092 reconstruction, renovation, restoration, rehabilitation, 1093 construction, or expansion of improvements to real property. 1094 d.ââSubstantially completedâ has the same meaning as 1095 provided in s. 192.042 s. 192.042(1). 1096 9.âThis paragraph expires on the date specified in s. 1097 290.016 for the expiration of the Florida Enterprise Zone Act. 1098 (n)âMaterials for construction of single-family homes in 1099 certain areas.â 1100 1.âAs used in this paragraph, the term: 1101 a.ââBuilding materialsâ means tangible personal property 1102 that becomes a component part of a qualified home. 1103 b.ââQualified homeâ means a single-family home having an 1104 appraised value of no more than $160,000 which is located in an 1105 enterprise zone, empowerment zone, or Front Porch Florida 1106 Community and which is constructed and occupied by the owner 1107 thereof for residential purposes. 1108 c.ââSubstantially completedâ has the same meaning as 1109 provided in s. 192.042 s. 192.042(1). 1110 2.âBuilding materials used in the construction of a 1111 qualified home and the costs of labor associated with the 1112 construction of a qualified home are exempt from the tax imposed 1113 by this chapter upon an affirmative showing to the satisfaction 1114 of the department that the requirements of this paragraph have 1115 been met. This exemption inures to the owner through a refund of 1116 previously paid taxes. To receive this refund, the owner must 1117 file an application under oath with the department which 1118 includes: 1119 a.âThe name and address of the owner. 1120 b.âThe address and assessment roll parcel number of the 1121 home for which a refund is sought. 1122 c.âA copy of the building permit issued for the home. 1123 d.âA certification by the local building code inspector 1124 that the home is substantially completed. 1125 e.âA sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, from the 1126 general contractor licensed in this state with whom the owner 1127 contracted to construct the home, which statement lists the 1128 building materials used in the construction of the home and the 1129 actual cost thereof, the labor costs associated with such 1130 construction, and the amount of sales tax paid on these 1131 materials and labor costs. If a general contractor was not used, 1132 the owner shall provide this information in a sworn statement, 1133 under penalty of perjury. Copies of invoices evidencing payment 1134 of sales tax must be attached to the sworn statement. 1135 f.âA sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, from the 1136 owner affirming that he or she is occupying the home for 1137 residential purposes. 1138 3.âAn application for a refund under this paragraph must be 1139 submitted to the department within 6 months after the date the 1140 home is deemed to be substantially completed by the local 1141 building code inspector. Within 30 working days after receipt of 1142 the application, the department shall determine if it meets the 1143 requirements of this paragraph. A refund approved pursuant to 1144 this paragraph shall be made within 30 days after formal 1145 approval of the application by the department. 1146 4.âThe department shall establish by rule an application 1147 form and criteria for establishing eligibility for exemption 1148 under this paragraph. 1149 5.âThe exemption shall apply to purchases of materials on 1150 or after July 1, 2000. 1151 (o)âBuilding materials in redevelopment projects.â 1152 1.âAs used in this paragraph, the term: 1153 a.ââBuilding materialsâ means tangible personal property 1154 that becomes a component part of a housing project or a mixed 1155 use project. 1156 b.ââHousing projectâ means the conversion of an existing 1157 manufacturing or industrial building to a housing unit which is 1158 in an urban high-crime area, an enterprise zone, an empowerment 1159 zone, a Front Porch Florida Community, a designated brownfield 1160 site for which a rehabilitation agreement with the Department of 1161 Environmental Protection or a local government delegated by the 1162 Department of Environmental Protection has been executed under 1163 s. 376.80 and any abutting real property parcel within a 1164 brownfield area, or an urban infill area; and in which the 1165 developer agrees to set aside at least 20 percent of the housing 1166 units in the project for low-income and moderate-income persons 1167 or the construction in a designated brownfield area of 1168 affordable housing for persons described in s. 420.0004(9), 1169 (11), (12), or (17) or in s. 159.603(7). 1170 c.ââMixed-use projectâ means the conversion of an existing 1171 manufacturing or industrial building to mixed-use units that 1172 include artistsâ studios, art and entertainment services, or 1173 other compatible uses. A mixed-use project must be located in an 1174 urban high-crime area, an enterprise zone, an empowerment zone, 1175 a Front Porch Florida Community, a designated brownfield site 1176 for which a rehabilitation agreement with the Department of 1177 Environmental Protection or a local government delegated by the 1178 Department of Environmental Protection has been executed under 1179 s. 376.80 and any abutting real property parcel within a 1180 brownfield area, or an urban infill area; and the developer must 1181 agree to set aside at least 20 percent of the square footage of 1182 the project for low-income and moderate-income housing. 1183 d.ââSubstantially completedâ has the same meaning as 1184 provided in s. 192.042 s. 192.042(1). 1185 2.âBuilding materials used in the construction of a housing 1186 project or mixed-use project are exempt from the tax imposed by 1187 this chapter upon an affirmative showing to the satisfaction of 1188 the department that the requirements of this paragraph have been 1189 met. This exemption inures to the owner through a refund of 1190 previously paid taxes. To receive this refund, the owner must 1191 file an application under oath with the department which 1192 includes: 1193 a.âThe name and address of the owner. 1194 b.âThe address and assessment roll parcel number of the 1195 project for which a refund is sought. 1196 c.âA copy of the building permit issued for the project. 1197 d.âA certification by the local building code inspector 1198 that the project is substantially completed. 1199 e.âA sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, from the 1200 general contractor licensed in this state with whom the owner 1201 contracted to construct the project, which statement lists the 1202 building materials used in the construction of the project and 1203 the actual cost thereof, and the amount of sales tax paid on 1204 these materials. If a general contractor was not used, the owner 1205 shall provide this information in a sworn statement, under 1206 penalty of perjury. Copies of invoices evidencing payment of 1207 sales tax must be attached to the sworn statement. 1208 3.âAn application for a refund under this paragraph must be 1209 submitted to the department within 6 months after the date the 1210 project is deemed to be substantially completed by the local 1211 building code inspector. Within 30 working days after receipt of 1212 the application, the department shall determine if it meets the 1213 requirements of this paragraph. A refund approved pursuant to 1214 this paragraph shall be made within 30 days after formal 1215 approval of the application by the department. 1216 4.âThe department shall establish by rule an application 1217 form and criteria for establishing eligibility for exemption 1218 under this paragraph. 1219 5.âThe exemption shall apply to purchases of materials on 1220 or after July 1, 2000. 1221 (q)âBuilding materials, the rental of tangible personal 1222 property, and pest control services used in new construction 1223 located in a rural area of opportunity.â 1224 1.âAs used in this paragraph, the term: 1225 a.ââBuilding materialsâ means tangible personal property 1226 that becomes a component part of improvements to real property. 1227 b.ââExempt goods and servicesâ means building materials, 1228 the rental of tangible personal property, and pest control 1229 services used in new construction. 1230 c.ââNew constructionâ means improvements to real property 1231 which did not previously exist. The term does not include the 1232 reconstruction, renovation, restoration, rehabilitation, 1233 modification, alteration, or expansion of buildings already 1234 located on the parcel on which the new construction is built. 1235 d.ââPest controlâ has the same meaning as in s. 482.021. 1236 e.ââReal propertyâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 1237 192.001, but does not include a condominium parcel or 1238 condominium property as defined in s. 718.103. 1239 f.ââSubstantially completedâ has the same meaning as in s. 1240 192.042 s. 192.042(1). 1241 2.âBuilding materials, the rental of tangible personal 1242 property, and pest control services used in new construction 1243 located in a rural area of opportunity, as designated by the 1244 Governor pursuant to s. 288.0656, are exempt from the tax 1245 imposed by this chapter if an owner, lessee, or lessor can 1246 demonstrate to the satisfaction of the department that the 1247 requirements of this paragraph have been met. Except as provided 1248 in subparagraph 3., this exemption inures to the owner, lessee, 1249 or lessor at the time the new construction occurs, but only 1250 through a refund of previously paid taxes. To receive a refund 1251 pursuant to this paragraph, the owner, lessee, or lessor of the 1252 new construction must file an application under oath with the 1253 Department of Commerce. The application must include all of the 1254 following: 1255 a.âThe name and address of the person claiming the refund. 1256 b.âAn address and assessment roll parcel number of the real 1257 property that was improved by the new construction for which a 1258 refund of previously paid taxes is being sought. 1259 c.âA description of the new construction. 1260 d.âA copy of a valid building permit issued by the county 1261 or municipal building department for the new construction. 1262 e.âA sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, from the 1263 general contractor licensed in this state with whom the 1264 applicant contracted to build the new construction, which 1265 specifies the exempt goods and services, the actual cost of the 1266 exempt goods and services, and the amount of sales tax paid in 1267 this state on the exempt goods and services, and which states 1268 that the improvement to the real property was new construction. 1269 If a general contractor was not used, the applicant shall make 1270 the sworn statement required by this sub-subparagraph. Copies of 1271 the invoices evidencing the actual cost of the exempt goods and 1272 services and the amount of sales tax paid on such goods and 1273 services must be attached to the sworn statement provided by the 1274 general contractor or by the applicant. If copies of such 1275 invoices are not attached, the cost of the exempt goods and 1276 services is deemed to be an amount equal to 40 percent of the 1277 increase in assessed value of the property for ad valorem tax 1278 purposes. 1279 f.âA certification by the local building code inspector 1280 that the new construction is substantially completed and is new 1281 construction. 1282 3.âThe exemption under this paragraph inures to a 1283 municipality, county, other governmental unit or agency, or 1284 nonprofit community-based organization through a refund of 1285 previously paid taxes if the exempt goods and services are paid 1286 for from the funds of a community development block grant, the 1287 State Housing Initiatives Partnership Program, or a similar 1288 grant or loan program. To receive a refund, a municipality, 1289 county, other governmental unit or agency, or nonprofit 1290 community-based organization must file an application that 1291 includes the same information required under subparagraph 2. In 1292 addition, the application must include a sworn statement signed 1293 by the chief executive officer of the municipality, county, 1294 other governmental unit or agency, or nonprofit community-based 1295 organization seeking a refund which states that the exempt goods 1296 and services for which a refund is sought were funded by a 1297 community development block grant, the State Housing Initiatives 1298 Partnership Program, or a similar grant or loan program. 1299 4.âWithin 10 working days after receiving an application, 1300 the Department of Commerce shall review the application to 1301 determine whether it contains all of the information required by 1302 subparagraph 2. or subparagraph 3., as appropriate, and meets 1303 the criteria set out in this paragraph. The Department of 1304 Commerce shall certify all applications that contain the 1305 required information and are eligible to receive a refund. The 1306 certification must be in writing and a copy must be transmitted 1307 by the Department of Commerce to the executive director of the 1308 department. The applicant is responsible for forwarding a 1309 certified application to the department within the period 1310 specified in subparagraph 5. 1311 5.âAn application for a refund must be submitted to the 1312 department within 6 months after the new construction is deemed 1313 to be substantially completed by the local building code 1314 inspector or by November 1 after the improved property is first 1315 subject to assessment. 1316 6.âOnly one exemption through a refund of previously paid 1317 taxes for the new construction may be claimed for any single 1318 parcel of property unless there is a change in ownership, a new 1319 lessor, or a new lessee of the real property. A refund may not 1320 be granted unless the amount to be refunded exceeds $500. A 1321 refund may not exceed the lesser of 97.5 percent of the Florida 1322 sales or use tax paid on the cost of the exempt goods and 1323 services as determined pursuant to sub-subparagraph 2.e. or 1324 $10,000. The department shall issue a refund within 30 days 1325 after it formally approves a refund application. 1326 7.âThe department shall deduct 10 percent of each refund 1327 amount granted under this paragraph from the amount transferred 1328 into the Local Government Half-cent Sales Tax Clearing Trust 1329 Fund pursuant to s. 212.20 for the county area in which the new 1330 construction is located and shall transfer that amount to the 1331 General Revenue Fund. 1332 8.âThe department may adopt rules governing the manner and 1333 format of refund applications and may establish guidelines as to 1334 the requisites for an affirmative showing of qualification for 1335 exemption under this paragraph. 1336 9.âThis exemption does not apply to improvements for which 1337 construction began before July 1, 2017. 1338 (u)âBuilding materials used in construction of affordable 1339 housing units.â 1340 1.âAs used in this paragraph, the term: 1341 a.ââAffordable housing developmentâ means property that has 1342 units subject to an agreement with the Florida Housing Finance 1343 Corporation pursuant to chapter 420 recorded in the official 1344 records of the county in which the property is located to 1345 provide affordable housing to natural persons or families 1346 meeting the extremely-low-income, very-low-income, or low-income 1347 limits specified in s. 420.0004. 1348 b.ââBuilding materialsâ means tangible personal property 1349 that becomes a component part of eligible residential units in 1350 an affordable housing development. The term includes appliances 1351 and does not include plants, landscaping, fencing, and 1352 hardscaping. 1353 c.ââEligible residential unitsâ means newly constructed 1354 units within an affordable housing development which are 1355 restricted under the land use restriction agreement. 1356 d.ââNewly constructedâ means improvements to real property 1357 which did not previously exist or the construction of a new 1358 improvement where an old improvement was removed. The term does 1359 not include the renovation, restoration, rehabilitation, 1360 modification, alteration, or expansion of buildings already 1361 located on the parcel on which the eligible residential unit is 1362 built. 1363 e.ââReal propertyâ has the same meaning as provided in s. 1364 192.001(12). 1365 f.ââSubstantially completedâ has the same meaning as in s. 1366 192.042 s. 192.042(1). 1367 2.âBuilding materials used in eligible residential units 1368 are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter if an owner 1369 demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the 1370 requirements of this paragraph have been met. Except as provided 1371 in subparagraph 3., this exemption inures to the owner at the 1372 time an eligible residential unit is substantially completed, 1373 but only through a refund of previously paid taxes. To receive a 1374 refund pursuant to this paragraph, the owner of the eligible 1375 residential units must file an application with the department. 1376 The application must include all of the following: 1377 a.âThe name and address of the person claiming the refund. 1378 b.âAn address and assessment roll parcel number of the real 1379 property that was improved for which a refund of previously paid 1380 taxes is being sought. 1381 c.âA description of the eligible residential units for 1382 which a refund of previously paid taxes is being sought, 1383 including the number of such units. 1384 d.âA copy of a valid building permit issued by the county 1385 or municipal building department for the eligible residential 1386 units. 1387 e.âA sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, from the 1388 general contractor licensed in this state with whom the owner 1389 contracted to build the eligible residential units which 1390 specifies the building materials, the actual cost of the 1391 building materials, and the amount of sales tax paid in this 1392 state on the building materials, and which states that the 1393 improvement to the real property was newly constructed. If a 1394 general contractor was not used, the owner must make the sworn 1395 statement required by this sub-subparagraph. Copies of the 1396 invoices evidencing the actual cost of the building materials 1397 and the amount of sales tax paid on such building materials must 1398 be attached to the sworn statement provided by the general 1399 contractor or by the owner. If copies of such invoices are not 1400 attached, the cost of the building materials is deemed to be an 1401 amount equal to 40 percent of the increase in the final assessed 1402 value of the eligible residential units for ad valorem tax 1403 purposes less the most recent assessed value of land for the 1404 units. 1405 f.âA certification by the local building code inspector 1406 that the eligible residential unit is substantially completed. 1407 g.âA copy of the land use restriction agreement with the 1408 Florida Housing Finance Corporation for the eligible residential 1409 units. 1410 3.âThe exemption under this paragraph inures to a 1411 municipality, county, other governmental unit or agency, or 1412 nonprofit community-based organization through a refund of 1413 previously paid taxes if the building materials are paid for 1414 from the funds of a community development block grant, the State 1415 Housing Initiatives Partnership Program, or a similar grant or 1416 loan program. To receive a refund, a municipality, county, other 1417 governmental unit or agency, or nonprofit community-based 1418 organization must submit an application that includes the same 1419 information required under subparagraph 2. In addition, the 1420 applicant must include a sworn statement signed by the chief 1421 executive officer of the municipality, county, other 1422 governmental unit or agency, or nonprofit community-based 1423 organization seeking a refund which states that the building 1424 materials for which a refund is sought were funded by a 1425 community development block grant, the State Housing Initiatives 1426 Partnership Program, or a similar grant or loan program. 1427 4.âThe person seeking a refund must submit an application 1428 for refund to the department within 6 months after the eligible 1429 residential unit is deemed to be substantially completed by the 1430 local building code inspector or by November 1 after the 1431 improved property is first subject to assessment. 1432 5.âOnly one exemption through a refund of previously paid 1433 taxes may be claimed for any eligible residential unit. A refund 1434 may not be granted unless the amount to be refunded exceeds 1435 $500. A refund may not exceed the lesser of $5,000 or 97.5 1436 percent of the Florida sales or use tax paid on the cost of 1437 building materials as determined pursuant to sub-subparagraph 1438 2.e. The department shall issue a refund within 30 days after it 1439 formally approves a refund application. 1440 6.âThe department may adopt rules governing the manner and 1441 format of refund applications and may establish guidelines as to 1442 the requisites for an affirmative showing of qualification for 1443 exemption under this paragraph. 1444 7.âThis exemption under this paragraph applies to sales of 1445 building materials that occur on or after July 1, 2023. 1446 Section 37.âNotwithstanding this act, the levying, 1447 assessment, or collection of any ad valorem taxes on tangible 1448 personal property before January 1, 2027, shall continue to be 1449 governed by existing law before such repeal or amendment made by 1450 this act. 1451 Section 38.âThis act shall take effect on the effective 1452 date of the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by SJR 1453 550 or a similar joint resolution having substantially the same 1454 specified intent and purpose, if such amendment to the State 1455 Constitution is approved at the next general election or at an 1456 earlier special election specifically authorized by law for that 1457 purpose.